be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 0 ліваць .
SFX 2294 Y 1
SFX 2294 0 жваюць .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 чымі .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 шчыца .
SFX 4244 Y 1
SFX 4244 0 шчыце .
SFX 2439 Y 1
SFX 2439 0 льнік .
SFX 4131 Y 1
SFX 4131 0 чаеце .
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 0 ышся .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 0 аўшыся .
SFX 3213 Y 1
SFX 3213 0 днаю .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 дная .
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 0 руецца .
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 0 ціліся .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 аваны .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 лены .
SFX 3010 Y 1
SFX 3010 0 чніку .
SFX 3500 Y 1
SFX 3500 0 чнікі .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 ера .
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 0 ысткай .
SFX 2912 Y 1
SFX 2912 0 ысткам .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 0 ьшчыках .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 0 ьшчыкаў .
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 0 ачка .
SFX 2997 Y 1
SFX 2997 0 шчыцкіх .
SFX 2996 Y 1
SFX 2996 0 шчыцкія .
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 0 нту .
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 0 нты .
SFX 4999 Y 1
SFX 4999 0 львала .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 нах .
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 0 наю .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 ная .
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 0 наў .
SFX 1939 Y 1
SFX 1939 0 чах .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 чаю .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 чая .
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 0 чаў .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 рскага .
SFX 4075 Y 1
SFX 4075 0 льна .
SFX 4262 Y 1
SFX 4262 0 цець .
SFX 4103 Y 1
SFX 4103 0 водствам .
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 0 ўнае .
SFX 2387 Y 1
SFX 2387 0 ўнай .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 арскаму .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 са .
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 0 се .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 нута .
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 0 вік .
SFX 4107 Y 1
SFX 4107 0 вім .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 0 авіком .
SFX 1353 Y 1
SFX 1353 0 істах .
SFX 1518 Y 1
SFX 1518 0 істаю .
SFX 1546 Y 1
SFX 1546 0 істая .
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 0 істаў .
SFX 1077 Y 1
SFX 1077 0 рнымі .
SFX 4858 Y 1
SFX 4858 0 аграфічнаю .
SFX 4857 Y 1
SFX 4857 0 аграфічная .
SFX 3545 Y 1
SFX 3545 0 нікавым .
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 0 нялі .
SFX 4074 Y 1
SFX 4074 0 мала .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 жны .
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 0 нную .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 0 ыўся .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 ернымі .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 0 біце .
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 0 емся .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 0 алагічны .
SFX 1568 Y 1
SFX 1568 0 ткамі .
SFX 4641 Y 1
SFX 4641 0 знаўчае .
SFX 4640 Y 1
SFX 4640 0 знаўчай .
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 0 носнаму .
SFX 505 Y 1
SFX 505 0 ванаму .
SFX 2533 Y 1
SFX 2533 0 ліш .
SFX 2534 Y 1
SFX 2534 0 ліў .
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 0 злі .
SFX 4876 Y 1
SFX 4876 0 шнаю .
SFX 4715 Y 1
SFX 4715 0 шная .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 енне .
SFX 2357 Y 1
SFX 2357 0 іруе .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 іруй .
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 0 аванаму .
SFX 3132 Y 1
SFX 3132 0 гадовымі .
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 0 ынай .
SFX 2991 Y 1
SFX 2991 0 ынам .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 0 раць .
SFX 3637 Y 1
SFX 3637 0 ліцца .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 ленага .
SFX 4202 Y 1
SFX 4202 0 йкам .
SFX 4357 Y 1
SFX 4357 0 альна .
SFX 4082 Y 1
SFX 4082 0 кавалі .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 раюся .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 0 тую .
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 0 евым .
SFX 4183 Y 1
SFX 4183 0 ненню .
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 0 нення .
SFX 4184 Y 1
SFX 4184 0 ненні .
SFX 1559 Y 1
SFX 1559 0 цкі .
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 0 тавым .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 0 рскую .
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 0 іну .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 іны .
SFX 3325 Y 1
SFX 3325 0 завацца .
SFX 3757 Y 1
SFX 3757 0 каецеся .
SFX 3532 Y 1
SFX 3532 0 оўвае .
SFX 3737 Y 1
SFX 3737 0 оўвай .
SFX 4136 Y 1
SFX 4136 0 цыйным .
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 0 ліваму .
SFX 3778 Y 1
SFX 3778 0 джваем .
SFX 4022 Y 1
SFX 4022 0 адзілі .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 0 дах .
SFX 1891 Y 1
SFX 1891 0 даю .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 0 даў .
SFX 4077 Y 1
SFX 4077 0 леце .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 оўкамі .
SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 0 заваў .
SFX 3083 Y 1
SFX 3083 0 шацца .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 ападобнымі .
SFX 2124 Y 1
SFX 2124 0 авіку .
SFX 2186 Y 1
SFX 2186 0 авікі .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 0 ляецца .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 водам .
SFX 4884 Y 1
SFX 4884 0 чэннем .
SFX 2702 Y 1
SFX 2702 0 льшчыцай .
SFX 2701 Y 1
SFX 2701 0 льшчыцам .
SFX 2507 Y 1
SFX 2507 0 ьскіх .
SFX 2506 Y 1
SFX 2506 0 ьскія .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 ваюся .
SFX 3473 Y 1
SFX 3473 0 дзіцца .
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 0 йся .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 0 аемся .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 уся .
SFX 1411 Y 1
SFX 1411 0 ліваеце .
SFX 3800 Y 1
SFX 3800 0 арскага .
SFX 944 Y 1
SFX 944 0 чках .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 чкаю .
SFX 4161 Y 1
SFX 4161 0 тэрапію .
SFX 4160 Y 1
SFX 4160 0 тэрапія .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 тэрапіі .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 анку .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 анкі .
SFX 1894 Y 1
SFX 1894 0 ьвайце .
SFX 2609 Y 1
SFX 2609 0 ьванне .
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 0 ыстка .
SFX 2233 Y 1
SFX 2233 0 авальнаю .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 авальная .
SFX 4317 Y 1
SFX 4317 0 за .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 0 зе .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 зм .
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 0 віку .
SFX 2730 Y 1
SFX 2730 0 вікі .
SFX 2212 Y 1
SFX 2212 0 нутымі .
SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 0 іроўцы .
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 0 льшчыка .
SFX 1047 Y 1
SFX 1047 0 рны .
SFX 2584 Y 1
SFX 2584 0 кне .
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 0 гаюць .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 істкай .
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 0 істкам .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 нных .
SFX 1179 Y 1
SFX 1179 0 нныя .
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 0 нікавую .
SFX 1041 Y 1
SFX 1041 0 авою .
SFX 4033 Y 1
SFX 4033 0 шваеш .
SFX 1622 Y 1
SFX 1622 0 ічны .
SFX 4776 Y 1
SFX 4776 0 носнага .
SFX 4345 Y 1
SFX 4345 0 вела .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 ванага .
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 0 пала .
SFX 4585 Y 1
SFX 4585 0 пім .
SFX 3723 Y 1
SFX 3723 0 слі .
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 0 завана .
SFX 4738 Y 1
SFX 4738 0 тайце .
SFX 4939 Y 1
SFX 4939 0 танне .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 0 шчах .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 шчаў .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 райцеся .
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 0 свалі .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 аванага .
SFX 3649 Y 1
SFX 3649 0 джваюць .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 сцкую .
SFX 2582 Y 1
SFX 2582 0 лілі .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 тнаму .
SFX 4199 Y 1
SFX 4199 0 кваеш .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 рамі .
SFX 3810 Y 1
SFX 3810 0 ыстымі .
SFX 1377 Y 1
SFX 1377 0 іяю .
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 0 ачках .
SFX 1641 Y 1
SFX 1641 0 ачкаю .
SFX 4003 Y 1
SFX 4003 0 льніца .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 тых .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 тыя .
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 0 ваўшыся .
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 0 ствуе .
SFX 4944 Y 1
SFX 4944 0 ствуй .
SFX 3619 Y 1
SFX 3619 0 оўшчыкам .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 каватымі .
SFX 4679 Y 1
SFX 4679 0 дайце .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 0 чыла .
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 0 ўшчыкам .
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 0 лівага .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 чкамі .
SFX 2847 Y 1
SFX 2847 0 алагічнаму .
SFX 4415 Y 1
SFX 4415 0 раннем .
SFX 4113 Y 1
SFX 4113 0 асу .
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 0 ася .
SFX 3564 Y 1
SFX 3564 0 ацыйным .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 тавую .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 оўвайце .
SFX 4138 Y 1
SFX 4138 0 цыйную .
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 0 шчыцу .
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 0 шчыцы .
SFX 4004 Y 1
SFX 4004 0 льніц .
SFX 1010 Y 1
SFX 1010 0 кавымі .
SFX 2130 Y 1
SFX 2130 0 ўкамі .
SFX 2871 Y 1
SFX 2871 0 тара .
SFX 4601 Y 1
SFX 4601 0 носным .
SFX 3767 Y 1
SFX 3767 0 ізаванаму .
SFX 2767 Y 1
SFX 2767 0 кацца .
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 0 еру .
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 0 еры .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 0 ыстках .
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 0 ысткаю .
SFX 4809 Y 1
SFX 4809 0 йкамі .
SFX 1507 Y 1
SFX 1507 0 ачку .
SFX 1446 Y 1
SFX 1446 0 ачкі .
SFX 3469 Y 1
SFX 3469 0 ізаваць .
SFX 4542 Y 1
SFX 4542 0 хаюся .
SFX 4998 Y 1
SFX 4998 0 львалі .
SFX 1163 Y 1
SFX 1163 0 ём .
SFX 4577 Y 1
SFX 4577 0 рце .
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 0 уемся .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 льны .
SFX 4795 Y 1
SFX 4795 0 льню .
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 0 льня .
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 0 льні .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 скімі .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 ўнаю .
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 0 ўная .
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 0 ьніку .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 ст .
SFX 1230 Y 1
SFX 1230 0 су .
SFX 1599 Y 1
SFX 1599 0 сы .
SFX 2435 Y 1
SFX 2435 0 сь .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 ся .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 сі .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 нуты .
SFX 4105 Y 1
SFX 4105 0 віш .
SFX 3346 Y 1
SFX 3346 0 віў .
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 0 авікоў .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 0 нецеся .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 арамі .
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 0 ннае .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 ннай .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 знаўства .
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 0 знаўстве .
SFX 3543 Y 1
SFX 3543 0 нікавых .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 нікавыя .
SFX 3994 Y 1
SFX 3994 0 малі .
SFX 3087 Y 1
SFX 3087 0 чваннем .
SFX 3987 Y 1
SFX 3987 0 нікавае .
SFX 3986 Y 1
SFX 3986 0 нікавай .
SFX 3806 Y 1
SFX 3806 0 яеце .
SFX 3142 Y 1
SFX 3142 0 біць .
SFX 4733 Y 1
SFX 4733 0 ціцеся .
SFX 4943 Y 1
SFX 4943 0 ствуйце .
SFX 4932 Y 1
SFX 4932 0 туецца .
SFX 3941 Y 1
SFX 3941 0 шуся .
SFX 4638 Y 1
SFX 4638 0 знаўчаю .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 знаўчая .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 ліва .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 тнага .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 атара .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 іце .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 насць .
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 0 насцю .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 насці .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 енню .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 ення .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 енні .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 ірую .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 ўшы .
SFX 3819 Y 1
SFX 3819 0 ынах .
SFX 2652 Y 1
SFX 2652 0 ынаю .
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 ляецеся .
SFX 2163 Y 1
SFX 2163 0 аннямі .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 тае .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 тай .
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 0 так .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 там .
SFX 4822 Y 1
SFX 4822 0 зіны .
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 0 рскае .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 рскай .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 йках .
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 0 ісцкімі .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 алагічнага .
SFX 1398 Y 1
SFX 1398 0 лівала .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 днаму .
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 0 альны .
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 0 аючы .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 ляюся .
SFX 4483 Y 1
SFX 4483 0 евых .
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 0 евыя .
SFX 2615 Y 1
SFX 2615 0 тавых .
SFX 2674 Y 1
SFX 2674 0 тавыя .
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 0 чанаму .
SFX 4539 Y 1
SFX 4539 0 хваеце .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 оўваю .
SFX 3526 Y 1
SFX 3526 0 оўваў .
SFX 4524 Y 1
SFX 4524 0 чайце .
SFX 4134 Y 1
SFX 4134 0 цыйных .
SFX 4133 Y 1
SFX 4133 0 цыйныя .
SFX 3776 Y 1
SFX 3776 0 джваеш .
SFX 1467 Y 1
SFX 1467 0 чанага .
SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 0 евае .
SFX 4323 Y 1
SFX 4323 0 евай .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 аваць .
SFX 3566 Y 1
SFX 3566 0 ацыйную .
SFX 1356 Y 1
SFX 1356 0 руеце .
SFX 3770 Y 1
SFX 3770 0 ізаванага .
SFX 4413 Y 1
SFX 4413 0 рыцеся .
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 0 чнаму .
SFX 3718 Y 1
SFX 3718 0 ура .
SFX 2632 Y 1
SFX 2632 0 водах .
SFX 2729 Y 1
SFX 2729 0 водаў .
SFX 2699 Y 1
SFX 2699 0 льшчыцах .
SFX 2698 Y 1
SFX 2698 0 льшчыцаю .
SFX 4768 Y 1
SFX 4768 0 нцамі .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 істымі .
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 0 оўваюцца .
SFX 4088 Y 1
SFX 4088 0 ізавацца .
SFX 4265 Y 1
SFX 4265 0 цела .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 аным .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 носную .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 ўнаму .
SFX 2809 Y 1
SFX 2809 0 раліся .
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 0 йцеся .
SFX 3884 Y 1
SFX 3884 0 лькай .
SFX 3196 Y 1
SFX 3196 0 лькам .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 0 ваць .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 ьванню .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 ьвання .
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 ьванні .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 ыстку .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 0 ысткі .
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 ства .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 стве .
SFX 4017 Y 1
SFX 4017 0 аром .
SFX 2021 Y 1
SFX 2021 0 зу .
SFX 3558 Y 1
SFX 3558 0 зы .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 0 зь .
SFX 1383 Y 1
SFX 1383 0 зі .
SFX 4754 Y 1
SFX 4754 0 оўвалася .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 0 льшчыку .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 льшчыкі .
SFX 2881 Y 1
SFX 2881 0 кну .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 кні .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 ваму .
SFX 2460 Y 1
SFX 2460 0 вамі .
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 0 істках .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 0 істкаю .
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 0 арнаму .
SFX 3611 Y 1
SFX 3611 0 ска .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 0 знаўствам .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 сным .
SFX 4496 Y 1
SFX 4496 0 велі .
SFX 1557 Y 1
SFX 1557 0 цкімі .
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 0 іліся .
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 0 палі .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 аванне .
SFX 4584 Y 1
SFX 4584 0 піш .
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 0 заваны .
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208 0 сцкае .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 сцкай .
SFX 1886 Y 1
SFX 1886 0 рала .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 танню .
SFX 4935 Y 1
SFX 4935 0 тання .
SFX 4937 Y 1
SFX 4937 0 танні .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 ерамі .
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 0 ычным .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 ваннямі .
